Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 2. License Transfer, Assignment, Control, and Change.

Sec. 06.50.200.
Transfer or assignment.

Except for the transfer of a license to a new location under AS

06.50.220

, a licensee may not transfer or assign the licensee’s license.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.210.
Change in control.

The prior written approval of the department is required for the continued operation of a licensee’s deferred deposit advance business when a change in control of the licensee is proposed. The department may require the information it considers necessary to determine whether a new application is required. The licensee requesting approval of the change in control shall pay all reasonable expenses incurred by the department to investigate and approve or deny the change in control.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.220.
Change in location or name.

A licensee shall notify the department in writing at least 15 days before any proposed change in the licensee’s business location or name, and shall provide the department with the information described in AS

06.50.030(a)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)

Sec. 06.50.230.
Conduct of other business.

A licensee may conduct other business at a location where it engages in making advances unless it conducts the other business for the purpose of evading or violating the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 116 SLA 2004)